Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2139
Director; rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate such
rules and regulations and issue such orders as necessary to carry out the
Insurance Holding Company System Act.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 19;

Laws 2012, LB887, § 14.

The director of the Department of Insurance should not be impeded in choices of remedy and protective measures by the enumerated powers of the Insurance Holding Company System Act. The importance of the director's duties as a watchdog for policyholders, and the fact that the director is the only watchdog whose authority can bind domestic insurers, counsel in favor of a broad construction of the Insurance Holding Company System Act and the remedies provided therein. CenTra, Inc. v. Chandler Ins. Co., 248 Neb. 844, 540 N.W.2d 318 (1995).